Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 8 Third-Party Prescription Programs

26-4-140.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Third-party Prescription Program Law of 1983.”

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-140

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-141.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that certain practices are unfair to providers of pharmaceuticals, are burdensome and costly to those providers, result in unfair increased costs to certain consumers, and threaten the availability of pharmaceuticals to the public. The General Assembly further finds that there is a need for regulation of certain practices engaged in by some third-party prescription program administrators.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-141

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-142.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Administrator” means that person, corporation, or business entity which administers a program, is legally liable for any payments to a participating pharmacy under a program, or both.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Insurance.

“Contract” means a program contract.

“Enrollee” means a consumer who receives pharmaceuticals under a program.

“Participating pharmacy” means a pharmacy having a contract to provide pharmaceuticals to enrollees under a program.

“Pharmaceuticals” means drugs, devices, or services available from a pharmacy.

“Prevailing rate” means the average wholesale price of the pharmaceutical during the applicable period, plus the usual, customary, and reasonable dispensing fee added thereto, provided that in no event shall the amount submitted for reimbursement by a pharmacy under this article exceed the eighty-fifth percentile of the retail prices charged by all pharmacies in Georgia for the same or similar pharmaceuticals during such period of time or the actual price charged by the submitting pharmacy to consumers, other than enrollees, for the same or similar pharmaceuticals during such period of time, whichever is less.

“Program” means a third-party prescription program.

“Program contract” means that contract creating rights and obligations between a participating pharmacy and a program or administrator.

“Program identification card” means a document which identifies enrollees as participants in a program.

“Third-party prescription program” means any system of providing payments or reimbursement of payments made for pharmaceuticals pursuant to a contract between a pharmacy and another party, including insurance companies and administrators of programs, who are not consumers of the pharmaceuticals under that contract and shall include, without being limited to, insurance plans whereby an enrollee receives pharmaceuticals which are paid for by insurance companies or administrators, or by an agent of his employer, or by others.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-142

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-143.
Approval of program by Commissioner; exemptions.

Unless the program is exempt under subsection (b) of this Code section, no administrator, person, corporation, or business entity shall offer, operate, or administer a program in this state unless that program has been submitted to the Commissioner, in a manner provided by the Commissioner, and is approved by the Commissioner as complying with the requirements of this article.

A program contract existing immediately prior to January 1, 1984, shall be exempt from the requirements of this article but shall not be renewed or otherwise extended beyond its renewal or expiration date, respectively, as specified immediately prior to January 1, 1984, unless the program under the renewed or extended contract is approved by the Commissioner under subsection (a) of this Code section, except that if no such expiration or renewal date is provided in that program contract, the program contract shall be submitted not later than March 1, 1984, to the Commissioner for approval.

A program providing pharmaceuticals pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49, the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977,” shall be exempt from the requirements of this article.

A policy or plan regulated under Title 33, relating to insurance, which does not include or utilize a third-party prescription program or contract shall be exempt from the requirements of this article.

A program approved by the Commissioner may have that approval revoked or suspended if it fails to meet any requirements therefor specified in this article or if it fails to be administered in conformity with those requirements.

Disapproval or revocation or suspension of approval of a program by the Commissioner shall constitute a contested case for purposes of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-143

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-144.
Participating pharmacies; claim reimbursements; cancellation of contracts.

A program offered in this state and not exempt under subsection (b) of Code Section 26-4-143 shall provide all of the following:

A statement of the method, frequency, and amount of claim reimbursement to participating pharmacies;

That any valid claim for pharmaceuticals under this program will be paid to a participating pharmacy within 30 days after the claim is received by the administrator if that claim is complete, accurate, and legible, as determined by the administrator;

That any valid claim not paid as required in paragraph (2) of this Code section shall be subject to interest at the rate specified in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 33-25-10, relating to payment of interest on life insurance proceeds;

That reimbursement rates for pharmaceuticals shall not be less than the prevailing rates therefor paid by consumers who are not enrollees;

That each participating pharmacy and enrollee will be notified in writing by the administrator of the cancellation of any program at least 30 days prior to the effective date of cancellation, except that where the administrator is not notified of such cancellation at least 30 days prior to the effective date of cancellation, the written notice shall be provided within 30 days after the administrator received his or her notification;

That program identification cards issued to an enrollee show an expiration date;

That the administrator shall make reasonable efforts to gain possession of all program identification cards upon cancellation of a program for which the cards were issued;

That a valid claim by a participating pharmacy will not be denied upon the basis of the fraudulent use of a program identification card;

That at least 30 days prior to the date a program becomes effective, the program contract therefor shall be offered to all pharmacies located within those counties wherein reside enrollees in that program, which pharmacies shall have at least 30 days from the time they receive the offer to accept that offer and become participating pharmacies;

That any audit by a program to verify claims by a participating pharmacy shall comply with generally accepted accounting principles and procedures but shall not extrapolate randomly sampled data as a basis for reimbursement from the pharmacy which is audited or from one participating pharmacy to be the corresponding data for another participating pharmacy. In the event a claim against a participating pharmacy for reimbursement is based upon a program audit, the administrator of the program shall submit details of the audit to that participating pharmacy, and any dispute relating thereto shall be resolved under the dispute resolution procedures required under paragraph (11) of this subsection, with the Commissioner to render a final binding decision in the dispute if either party is dissatisfied with the outcome under the dispute resolution procedure; and

A dispute resolution procedure for disputes between the program or administrator and participating pharmacies and between the program or administrator and enrollees.

A program which meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be administered except in conformity with those requirements, and the administration of that program except in conformity with those requirements shall constitute a violation of this Code section by the administrator of that program.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-144

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 26.

26-4-145.
Excessive charges to enrollees prohibited.

A participating pharmacy shall not submit claims for payment for pharmaceuticals under a program for charges in excess of those charged by that pharmacy to consumers, other than enrollees, for the same or similar pharmaceuticals.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-145

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-146.
Administrator; registration; bond.

On and after January 1, 1984, no person, corporation, or business entity shall serve as administrator of a program which has no administrator registered under this Code section unless that person, corporation, or business entity is registered as administrator of that program with the Commissioner.

No administrator may be registered unless the administrator gives bond to the Commissioner conditioned to pay all losses, damages, and expenses incurred as a result of any violation of this article by the administrator or the program being administered thereby. The bond shall be with a surety approved by the Commissioner in the amount of $200,000.00 or the total annual payments made in the immediately preceding year by all programs administered by that administrator, whichever is greater; provided, however, if the administrator is an insurance company licensed to transact insurance in this state or if the administrator is a self-insurer and is approved by the Commissioner, then such administrator shall not be required to give bond to the Commissioner.

No program shall be required to have more than one administrator registered and bonded under this Code section.

An administrator may have his or her registration suspended or revoked by the Commissioner upon any violation of this article by the administrator or when any program administered by the administrator fails to conform to the requirements of this article. The refusal by the Commissioner to register an administrator and the suspension or revocation of an administrator’s registration shall constitute a contested case for purposes of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Records, information, and other identifying matter obtained through the submission of a claim for reimbursement by a participating pharmacy shall be used exclusively and solely for the purposes of verification and payment to the participating pharmacy and policyholder and for no other purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-146

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 26.

26-4-147.
Liability of enrollees.

No enrollee may utilize a program identification card to obtain pharmaceuticals after the program has been canceled and after the enrollee has received notification of the cancellation, and if such card is so utilized, that enrollee shall be liable to the administrator of that program for the cost of those pharmaceuticals.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-147

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-148.
Violations of article; penalties.

Any person, corporation, or business entity which violates subsection (a) of Code Section 26-4-146 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person, corporation, or business entity which violates any provision of this article shall be subject to a civil penalty in the amount of $1,000.00 for each act in violation of this article or, if the violation was knowing and willful, a civil penalty of $5,000.00 for each act in violation of this article.

Any person injured as a result of a violation of this article may bring an action against that person, corporation, or business entity violating this article for the recovery of all actual damages occurring as a result thereof, plus attorneys’ fees.

An action may be brought against any person, corporation, or business entity subject to civil penalties or an action for damages under this Code section in the county in this state in which the person resides or corporation or business entity maintains an office or, if neither residing nor maintaining an office in this state, in the Superior Court of Fulton County.

All penalties and remedies provided in this Code section are cumulative of each other and of any other penalties and remedies otherwise provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-148

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.